Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-2601
State Board of Health; members; appointment; qualifications.

(1) The State Board of Health shall promote and protect the health and safety of all people in Nebraska.

(2) The board shall consist of seventeen members to be appointed by the Governor with the consent of a majority of the members of the Legislature. Two members shall be licensed to practice medicine and surgery in this state, one member shall be licensed to practice dentistry in this state, one member shall be licensed to practice optometry in this state, one member shall be licensed to practice veterinary medicine in this state, one member shall be licensed to practice pharmacy in this state, two members shall be licensed to practice nursing in this state, one member shall be licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery or as an osteopathic physician in this state, one member shall be licensed to practice podiatry in this state, one member shall be licensed to practice chiropractic in this state, one member shall be licensed to practice physical therapy in this state, one member shall be a professional engineer in this state, one member shall be an administrator of a hospital in this state which is licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act, one member shall be a credentialed mental health professional, and two members shall be public members who at all times are public-spirited citizens of Nebraska interested in the health of the people of the State of Nebraska and not less than twenty-one years of age. If a member fails at any time to meet the qualifications for the position for which he or she was appointed, such member may be removed by the Governor pursuant to section 71-2603.

(3) The Governor shall also be an ex officio member of such board but shall be permitted to vote on matters before the board only when necessary to break a tie.

Laws 1953, c. 335, § 7, p. 1102;

Laws 1959, c. 327, § 1, p. 1191;

Laws 1967, c. 454, § 1, p. 1405;

Laws 1969, c. 574, § 1, p. 2320;

Laws 1971, LB 279, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 575, § 1;

Laws 1989, LB 342, § 30;

Laws 1993, LB 375, § 2;

Laws 1995, LB 563, § 46;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 105;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 168;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 107;

Laws 2003, LB 56, § 1.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.